North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-06 Service of Process [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.
Also, held repealed by omission from Century Code,
in Higgins v. Hawks, 122 N.W.2d 129 (1963).]

28-06-01.
Service of summons — Generally. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-02.
Minor — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-03.
Incompetent — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-04.
Public corporation — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-05.
State or an agency thereof — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-06.
Domestic corporation — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-07.
Foreign corporation — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-08.
Foreign corporation without authorized agent — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-09.
Partnership or association — Service of summons upon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-10.
Service of summons in other cases. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-11.
Nonresident motor vehicle user — Service upon. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 39-01-11.

28-06-12.
Mailing notice to defendant upon service of nonresident motor vehicle user. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 39-01-12.

28-06-13.
Commissioner to keep record of process received for nonresident motor vehicle users. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 39-01-13.

28-06-14.
Protecting rights of defendant served as nonresident motor vehicle user. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 39-01-14.

28-06-15.
Service of process, writ, or order same in all courts — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

28-06-16.
Service deemed personal. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-17.
Appearance equivalent to personal service. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-06-18.
No civil process served on election day. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 1-08-09.

28-06-19.
By whom summons served. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-20.
Service by publication permitted, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-21.
Filing of complaint and affidavit for service by publication. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 29-21-38.

28-06-22.
Number of publications. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-23.
Mailing summons and complaint. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-24.
Personal service outside state equivalent to publication. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-25.
Time when first publication or service outside state must be made. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-26.
When service by publication or outside state complete. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-27.
When defendant served by publication permitted to defend. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-28.
Proof of service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-29.
Contents of affidavit of service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.

28-06-30.
Removal of pleadings for service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 5.

28-06-31.
Jurisdiction acquired, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-06-32.
Amendment of process and proof of service. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 4.